Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.050

Pension and retirement systems.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to alter or affect vested rights of city employees under pension and retirement systems in effect at the time this title becomes effective.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.050.]